Mississippi statutes. Title 87. Contracts and Contractual Relations
Uniform Durable Power of Attorney Act

§ 87-3-101.
Short title.

Sections 87-3-101 through 87-3-113 may be cited as the “Uniform Durable Power of Attorney Act.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 336, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 87-3-103.
Application and construction of sections 87-3-101 through 87-3-113.

Sections 87-3-101 through 87-3-113 shall be applied and construed to effectuate their general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of these sections among states enacting the Uniform Durable Power of Attorney Act.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 336, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 87-3-105.
Definition.

A durable power of attorney is a power of attorney by which a principal designates another his attorney in fact in writing and the writing contains the words “This power of attorney shall not be affected by subsequent disability or incapacity of the principal, or lapse of time,” or “This power of attorney shall become effective upon the disability or incapacity of the principal,” or similar words showing the intent of the principal that the authority conferred shall be exercisable notwithstanding the principal’s subsequent disability or incapacity, and, unless it states a time of termination, notwithstanding the lapse of time since the execution of the instrument.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 336, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 87-3-107.
Durable power of attorney not affected by lapse of time, disability or incapacity.

All acts done by an attorney in fact pursuant to a durable power of attorney during any period of disability or incapacity of the principal have the same effect and inure to the benefit of and bind the principal and his successors in interest as if the principal were competent and not disabled. Unless the instrument states a time of termination, the power is exercisable notwithstanding the lapse of time since the execution of the instrument.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 336, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 87-3-109.
Relation of attorney in fact to court-appointed fiduciary.

If, following execution of a durable power of attorney, a court of the principal’s domicile appoints a conservator, guardian of the estate, or other fiduciary charged with the management of all of the principal’s property or all of his property except specified exclusions, the attorney in fact is accountable to the fiduciary as well as to the principal. The fiduciary has the same power to revoke or amend the power of attorney that the principal would have had if he were not disabled or incapacitated.

A principal may nominate, by a durable power of attorney, the conservator, guardian of his estate, or guardian of his person for consideration by the court if protective proceedings for the principal’s person or estate are thereafter commenced. The court shall make its appointment in accordance with the principal’s most recent nomination in a durable power of attorney except for good cause or disqualification.

Any person acting in a fiduciary capacity shall exercise all rights and powers granted to a fiduciary under the Revised Uniform Fiduciary Access to Digital Assets Act created under Chapter 23, Title 91.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 336, § 3; Laws, 2017, ch. 419, § 22, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 87-3-111.
Power of attorney not revoked until notice.

The death of a principal who has executed a written power of attorney, durable or otherwise, does not revoke or terminate the agency as to the attorney in fact or other person, who, without actual knowledge of the death of the principal, acts in good faith under the power. Any action so taken, unless otherwise invalid or unenforceable, binds successors in interest of the principal.

The disability or incapacity of a principal who has previously executed a written power of attorney that is not a durable power does not revoke or terminate the agency as to the attorney in fact or other person, who, without actual knowledge of the disability or incapacity of the principal, acts in good faith under the power. Any action so taken, unless otherwise invalid or unenforceable, binds the principal and his successors in interest.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 336, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 87-3-113.
Proof of continuance of durable and other powers of attorney by affidavit.

As to acts undertaken in good faith reliance thereon, an affidavit executed by the attorney in fact under a power of attorney, durable or otherwise, stating that he did not have at the time of exercise of the power actual knowledge of the termination of the power by revocation or of the principal’s death, disability, or incapacity is conclusive proof of the nonrevocation or nontermination of the power at that time. If the exercise of the power of attorney requires execution and delivery of any instrument that is recordable, the affidavit when authenticated for record is likewise recordable. This section does not affect any provision in a power of attorney for its termination by expiration of time or occurrence of an event other than express revocation or a change in the principal’s capacity.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 336, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1994.